Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 25 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A cabinet secretary appointed by the Governor pursuant to
Section 10.3 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes and an executive
director of any entity organized within the executive department of
the government of the State of Oklahoma or chief executive officer
or other official with primary responsibility to operate and manage
the entity may serve for a maximum period of twelve (12) years.
B. The limitation prescribed by this section shall be
cumulative with respect to service as either a cabinet secretary or
Req. No. 14061 Page 1

the executive director, or its equivalent position, of an executive
state governmental entity so that the total period of service,
whether as a cabinet secretary or as an agency executive director,
shall not exceed twelve (12) years.
C. For purposes of this section, twelve (12) years shall also
be equal to a period of one hundred forty-four (144) months.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14061 MAH 01/12/26















Req. No. 14061 Page 2